California statutes. Elections Code
 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3074, 3075, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3134, 3138, 3146, 3147, 3148, 3149, 3150, 3151, 3152, 3198, 3205, 3206, 3208, 3209, 3210, 3211, 3212, 3213, 3214, 3215, 3216, 3217, 3218, 3219, 3220, 3221, 3222, 3223, 3224, 3225, 3226, 3230, 3231, 3232, 3233, 3234, 3235, 3236, 3238, 3239, 3242, 3252

9201.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002,
 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1096

VENTURA

Whole Tracts in Ventura County

0003.02, 0003.03, 0003.04, 0004.00, 0005.00, 0006.00, 0007.01, 0007.02, 0008.00, 0029.01, 0029.05, 0030.10, 0030.11, 0030.13, 0031.01, 0031.02, 0032.01, 0033.01, 0033.02, 0036.08, 0036.13, 0036.14, 0036.15, 0036.16, 0036.17, 0037.00, 0038.01, 0038.02, 0039.01, 0039.02, 0040.00, 0041.01, 0042.00,
 0043.04, 0043.05, 0044.00, 0045.03, 0045.04, 0045.05, 0045.07, 0045.08, 0046.00, 0047.04, 0047.10, 0047.11, 0047.15, 0047.16, 0047.17, 0049.01, 0049.02, 0050.02, 0050.04, 0050.05, 0050.06, 0052.02, 0052.03, 0052.04, 0052.05, 0053.04, 0053.05, 0053.06, 0053.07, 0053.08, 0054.01, 0054.03, 0054.04, 0055.02, 0055.03, 0055.04, 0056.01, 0056.02, 0057.00, 0058.01, 0058.03, 0058.04, 0059.01, 0059.06, 0059.07, 0059.08, 0059.09, 0059.10, 0059.11, 0060.00, 0061.01, 0061.02, 0062.00, 0063.01, 0063.02, 0064.00, 0065.00, 0066.00, 0067.00, 0068.00, 0069.00, 0070.00, 0071.00, 0072.01, 0072.02, 0074.02, 0074.03, 0074.06, 0075.08, 0075.10, 0076.07, 0076.09, 0076.10, 0076.11, 0076.12, 0076.13, 0086.01, 0086.02, 0087.00, 0088.00, 0089.00, 0091.00, 0092.00, 0093.00, 0097.00

Partial Tracts in Ventura County

0009.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009,
 1021, 1026, 1028, 1036, 1040, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003

0009.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2025, 2026, 2027

0009.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2057, 3000, 3001, 3012, 3013

0010.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 2000, 2002, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020

0012.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 3015

0012.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1029, 1030, 1034, 1036, 1037, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046

0013.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033

0013.03--the following census blocks:

1013, 1019, 1023

0014.02--the following census blocks:

1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1026, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033

0015.06--the following census blocks:

2006, 3013

0020.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 3000

0022.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 4000

0023.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2003

0025.00--the following census blocks:

3009, 3010, 3011

0028.00--the following census blocks:

1033, 1035, 1040, 1042, 1043, 1050, 1051, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1076, 1077, 1079, 1080

0036.18--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035

0073.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046,
 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099

0074.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015

0075.06--the following census blocks:

1010

0075.07--the following census blocks:

1006

0075.09--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

0075.11--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029

0075.15--the following census blocks:

1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020

0075.16--the following census blocks:

2015, 2016, 2017

0076.14--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003,
 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2013, 2014, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026

0077.00--the following census blocks:

1014, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1058, 1068

0084.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1003, 1004,
 1005, 1007, 1008, 2000

0085.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2017, 2018, 2019

0096.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003

9901.00--the following census blocks:

0004, 0005, 0006, 0007, 0008, 0009, 0010

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21427.

Congressional District 27 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 27

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

1066.03, 1066.41, 1066.42, 1066.45, 1066.46, 1092.00, 1093.00, 1097.00, 1098.00, 1111.00, 1114.01, 1114.02, 1153.02, 1154.01, 1154.03, 1154.04, 1173.02, 1311.00, 1312.00, 1313.00, 1314.00, 1318.02, 1319.00, 1320.01, 1320.02, 1321.01, 1323.02, 9003.01, 9005.01, 9005.04, 9005.05, 9005.06, 9005.08, 9005.09, 9005.10, 9006.02, 9006.06, 9006.07, 9006.08, 9006.09, 9006.10, 9006.11, 9007.01, 9007.03, 9007.04, 9007.05, 9008.04, 9008.05, 9008.06, 9008.07, 9008.08, 9010.03, 9010.07, 9010.08, 9010.09, 9010.10, 9010.11, 9010.12,
 9010.14, 9012.14, 9012.18, 9102.10, 9102.14, 9102.15, 9102.16, 9102.17, 9102.18, 9103.02, 9104.01, 9104.04, 9104.05, 9105.01, 9105.02, 9105.04, 9105.05, 9106.01, 9106.02, 9106.05, 9106.06, 9106.07, 9106.08, 9107.06, 9107.07, 9107.12, 9107.13, 9107.14, 9107.15, 9107.16, 9107.17, 9107.18, 9107.19, 9107.20, 9107.21, 9108.07, 9200.13, 9200.15, 9200.16, 9200.17, 9200.18, 9200.20, 9200.28, 9200.29, 9200.30, 9200.31, 9200.34, 9200.35, 9200.38, 9200.39, 9200.40, 9200.41, 9200.42, 9200.44, 9200.45, 9200.46, 9200.47, 9200.48, 9200.49, 9200.50, 9201.09, 9201.10, 9201.11, 9201.12, 9201.14, 9201.15, 9201.20, 9201.21, 9202.00, 9203.12, 9203.13, 9203.14, 9203.22, 9203.26, 9203.28, 9203.29, 9203.30, 9203.31, 9203.32, 9203.34, 9203.38, 9203.39, 9203.40, 9203.41, 9203.42, 9203.43, 9800.04, 9800.22

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

1066.43--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1004,
 1005, 1009, 1011, 1013

1112.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2010, 2011

1112.02--the following census blocks:

1011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020

1113.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013

1113.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019

1151.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017

1151.04--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013

1152.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019

1153.01--the following census
 blocks:

4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007

1173.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008

1310.21--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002

1310.22--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 2005

1310.23--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1014, 1015

1318.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015

1321.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010

1323.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010

1327.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016

1329.00--the following census blocks:

2000

9009.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003,
 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116

9009.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2038, 2039, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044,
 2045, 2046, 2047, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2108, 2109

9010.13--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013

9011.01--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005

9011.02--the following census blocks:

1018, 3000, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3015, 3017, 3025, 3026

9012.17--the following census blocks:

1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043

9013.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113,
 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1224, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1235, 1236, 1237, 1238, 1239, 1240, 1241, 1242, 1243, 1244, 1245, 1246, 1247, 1248, 1249, 1250, 1251, 1252, 1253, 1254, 1255, 1256, 1257, 1258, 1259, 1260, 1261, 1262, 1263, 1264, 1265, 1266, 1267, 1268, 1269, 1270, 1271, 1272, 1273, 1274, 1275, 1276, 1277, 1278, 1279, 1280, 1281, 1282, 1283,
 1284, 1285, 1286, 1287, 1288, 1289, 1290, 1291, 1292, 1293, 1294, 1297, 1298, 1299, 1300, 1301, 1302, 1303, 1304, 1305, 1306, 1307, 1308, 1309, 1310, 1311, 1312, 1313, 1314, 1315, 1316, 1317, 1318, 1319, 1320, 1321, 1322, 1323, 1324, 1325, 1326, 1327, 1328, 1329, 1330, 1331, 1332, 1333, 1334, 1335, 1336, 1337, 1338, 1339, 1340, 1343

9100.02--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097,
 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030

9102.11--the following census
 blocks:

1003

9102.12--the following census blocks:

1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 2000, 2001, 2005, 2020, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049

9102.13--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066

9103.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012

9107.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071

9108.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1132

9108.08--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

9108.09--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1005

9108.14--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2020, 2021, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2042, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2078, 2079, 2083

9108.15--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3017, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3028, 3029,
 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3199

9110.01--the following census blocks:

1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1101, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1127, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1140, 1141, 1147, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3109, 3111, 3112,
 3113, 3127, 3131, 3138, 3139

9111.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144,
 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1224, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1235, 1236, 1237, 1238, 1239, 1240, 1241, 1242, 1243, 1244, 1245, 1246, 1247, 1248, 1249, 1250, 1251, 1252, 1253, 1254, 1255, 1256, 1257, 1258, 1259, 1260, 1261, 1262, 1263, 1264, 1265, 1266, 1267, 1268, 1269, 1270, 1271, 1272, 1273, 1274, 1275, 1276, 1277, 1278, 1279, 1280, 1281, 1282, 1285, 1286, 1287, 1294, 1295, 1302, 1303, 1304, 1305, 1306, 1307, 1308, 1309, 1310, 1311, 1312, 1313, 1314, 1315, 1316, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011,
 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041

9200.43--the following census blocks:

1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

9201.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1018, 1019, 1020,
 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1033, 3065, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3129, 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3139, 3140, 3141, 3142, 3143, 3144, 3145, 3153, 3154, 3155, 3156, 3157, 3158, 3159, 3160, 3161, 3162, 3163, 3164, 3165, 3166, 3167, 3168, 3169, 3170, 3171, 3172, 3173, 3174, 3175, 3176, 3177, 3178, 3179, 3180, 3181, 3182, 3183, 3184, 3185, 3186, 3187, 3188, 3189, 3190, 3191, 3192, 3193, 3194, 3195, 3196, 3197, 3199, 3200, 3201, 3202, 3203, 3204, 3207, 3227, 3228, 3229, 3237, 3240, 3241, 3243, 3244, 3245, 3246, 3247, 3248, 3249, 3250, 3251

9201.06--the following census blocks:

1095

9203.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1028

9800.03--the following census blocks:

1006, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059

9800.08--the following census blocks:

1007

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21428.

Congressional District 28 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 28

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

3001.00, 3002.00, 3005.01, 4304.00, 4305.01, 4305.02, 4306.00, 4307.01, 4307.21, 4307.23, 4307.24, 4308.01, 4308.02, 4308.03, 4316.00, 4317.01, 4318.00, 4319.00, 4320.01, 4320.02, 4322.01, 4322.02, 4329.01, 4336.01, 4336.02, 4600.01, 4600.02, 4601.01, 4602.00, 4603.01, 4603.02, 4604.01, 4605.01, 4605.02, 4606.01, 4607.00, 4610.00, 4611.00, 4612.00, 4613.00, 4614.00, 4615.01, 4615.02, 4619.01, 4619.02, 4620.01, 4620.02, 4621.00, 4622.01, 4622.02, 4623.01, 4623.02, 4624.00, 4625.00, 4626.00, 4627.00, 4628.00, 4629.00,
 4630.00, 4631.03, 4632.00, 4633.00, 4634.00, 4635.00, 4636.01, 4636.02, 4637.00, 4638.00, 4639.00, 4640.00, 4641.01, 4641.02, 4642.00, 4800.02, 4800.11, 4800.12, 4801.01, 4801.02, 4802.01, 4802.02, 4803.02, 4803.03, 4803.04, 4804.00, 4805.00, 4806.01, 4806.02, 4807.02, 4807.03, 4807.04, 4808.02, 4808.03, 4808.04, 4809.01, 4809.02, 4809.03, 4810.01, 4810.02, 4811.01, 4811.02, 4811.03, 4812.01, 4812.03, 4813.00, 4814.01, 4814.03, 4814.04, 4815.00, 4816.03, 4816.04, 4816.05, 4816.06, 4817.11, 4817.12, 4817.13, 4817.14, 4818.00, 4819.01, 4819.02, 4820.01, 4820.02, 4821.01, 4821.02, 4822.01, 4822.02, 4823.01, 4823.03, 4823.04, 4824.01, 4824.03, 4824.04, 4825.02, 4825.03, 4825.21, 4826.00, 4827.01, 4827.02, 4828.01

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

1831.01--the following census blocks:

2004, 2006

3005.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009

4002.05--the following census blocks:

1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1028, 1029, 1032, 1038, 1041, 1061

4002.09--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2014, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031

4004.04--the following census blocks:

2014, 2015, 2016, 2019, 2030, 2033

4005.01--the following census blocks:

1020, 1021, 1022

4016.01--the following census blocks:

2004, 2005

4313.00--the following census blocks:

2004, 2005, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

4314.00--the following census blocks:

1016, 2002

4315.01--the following census blocks:

1003, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010

4315.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 4000, 4001, 4002

4321.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009

4321.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5010, 5011

4325.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2006

4329.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008,
 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018

4608.00--the following census blocks:

1016, 2025, 2026, 2028

4609.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4008, 4011

4616.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 3000, 3001, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4016

4617.00--the following census blocks:

2022, 2023, 2024, 2025

4825.22--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1011, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2002

5300.07--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3010

5304.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3015

9108.15--the following census blocks:

3040, 3041, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3069, 3099, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3178, 3179, 3180, 3186, 3187, 3188, 3189, 3190, 3191, 3192, 3193, 3194, 3195, 3196, 3197,
 3198

9110.01--the following census blocks:

3037, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3107, 3108, 3110, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3120, 3128, 3129, 3130

9304.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2054,
 2058, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3129, 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3134, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3138, 3139, 3140, 3141, 3142, 3143, 3144, 3145, 3146, 3147, 3148, 3149, 3150, 3151, 3152, 3153, 3154, 3155, 3156, 3157, 3158, 3159, 3160, 3161, 3162, 3163,
 3164, 3165, 3166, 3167, 3168, 3169, 3170, 3171, 3172, 3173, 3174, 3175, 3176, 3177, 3178, 3179, 3180, 3181, 3182, 3183, 3184, 3185, 3186, 3187, 3188, 3189, 3190, 3191, 3192, 3193, 3194, 3195, 3196, 3197, 3198, 3199, 3200, 3201, 3202, 3203, 3204, 3205, 3206, 3207, 3208, 3209, 3210, 3211, 3212, 3213, 3214, 3215, 3216, 3217, 3218, 3219, 3220, 3221, 3222, 3223, 3224, 3225, 3226, 3227, 3228, 3229, 3230, 3231, 3232, 3233, 3234, 3235, 3236, 3237, 3238, 3239, 3240, 3241, 3242, 3243, 3244, 3245, 3246, 3247, 3248, 3249, 3250, 3251, 3252, 3253, 3254, 3255, 3256, 3257, 3258, 3259, 3260, 3261, 3262, 3263, 3264, 3265, 3266, 3267, 3268, 3269, 3270, 3271, 3272, 3273, 3274, 3275, 3276, 3277, 3278

9800.36--the following census blocks:

1005

SAN BERNARDINO

Whole Tracts in San Bernardino County

0008.04, 0008.08,
 0008.12, 0008.13, 0008.14, 0008.15, 0008.16, 0008.17, 0008.18, 0008.19, 0008.20, 0020.11, 0020.13, 0020.14, 0020.15, 0020.17, 0020.18, 0020.23, 0020.25, 0020.49, 0092.01

Partial Tracts in San Bernardino County

0020.16--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2016, 2017

0020.19--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2002

0020.21--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021

0020.27--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

0020.28--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018

0020.35--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007

0020.40--the following census blocks:

1000

0020.41--the following census blocks:

2001

0020.42--the following census blocks:

1011

0020.51--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006

0021.05--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001

0027.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002

0092.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004,
 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182,
 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1223, 1224, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1235, 1236, 1237, 1238, 1239, 1240, 1241, 1242, 1243, 1244, 1245, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21429.

Congressional District 29 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 29

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

1021.03, 1021.04, 1021.05, 1033.00, 1041.03, 1041.05, 1041.08, 1042.01, 1042.03, 1042.04, 1043.10, 1043.21, 1043.22, 1044.01, 1044.03, 1044.04, 1045.00, 1046.10, 1046.20, 1047.01, 1047.03, 1047.04, 1048.21, 1048.22, 1048.23, 1048.24, 1060.10, 1060.20, 1061.11, 1061.12, 1061.13, 1061.14, 1064.03, 1064.05, 1064.06, 1064.07, 1064.08, 1065.10, 1065.20, 1066.04, 1066.48, 1066.49, 1070.10, 1070.20, 1091.00, 1094.00, 1095.00, 1096.01, 1096.03, 1096.04, 1171.01, 1171.02, 1172.01, 1172.02, 1173.03, 1174.04, 1174.05, 1174.07,
 1174.08, 1175.10, 1175.20, 1175.30, 1190.01, 1190.03, 1190.04, 1192.01, 1192.02, 1193.10, 1193.20, 1193.40, 1193.41, 1193.42, 1194.00, 1197.00, 1198.01, 1198.02, 1199.00, 1200.10, 1200.20, 1200.30, 1201.03, 1201.04, 1201.05, 1201.06, 1201.07, 1201.08, 1203.00, 1204.00, 1210.10, 1210.20, 1211.01, 1211.02, 1212.10, 1212.21, 1212.22, 1216.00, 1218.01, 1218.02, 1219.00, 1220.00, 1221.20, 1221.21, 1221.22, 1222.00, 1224.10, 1224.20, 1230.10, 1230.20, 1231.03, 1231.04, 1232.03, 1232.04, 1232.05, 1232.06, 1233.01, 1233.03, 1233.04, 1234.10, 1234.20, 1235.10, 1235.20, 1236.01, 1236.02, 1237.00, 1238.00, 1239.01, 1239.02, 1240.00, 1241.02, 1241.03, 1241.04, 1241.05, 1242.01, 1242.03, 1242.04, 1243.00, 1244.00, 1245.00, 1249.02, 1249.03, 1251.01, 1251.02, 1252.00, 1253.10, 1253.21, 1253.22, 1254.03, 1254.04, 1255.01, 1255.02, 1256.00, 1271.02, 1271.03, 1271.04, 1272.10, 1272.20, 1273.00, 1274.00, 1275.20, 1276.03, 1276.04, 1276.05, 1276.06, 1277.11, 1277.12, 1278.03, 1278.04, 1278.05, 1278.06, 1279.10, 1279.20,
 1281.01, 1281.02, 1282.10, 1282.20, 1283.02, 1283.03, 1284.00, 1286.01, 1431.01, 1431.02, 3201.01, 3201.02, 3202.01, 3202.02, 3203.00, 9800.21

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

1021.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 2005, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2024

1032.01--the following census blocks:

1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2011

1032.02--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030,
 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034

1041.24--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3022, 3023, 3026

1173.01--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007

1246.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3007

1247.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002,
 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006

1254.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

1285.00--the following census blocks:
